New York, session 2025-2026, S2051.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4 of section 51 of the alcoholic beverage 2 control law, as amended by chapter 431 of the laws of 2014, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 4. A licensed brewery may operate a restaurant, a hotel, an establish- 5 ment designated and commonly known and operated as a bed and breakfast, 6 a catering establishment, or other food and drinking establishment in or 7 adjacent to the licensed premises and sell at such place, at retail for 8 consumption on the premises, beer manufactured by the licensee and any 9 New York state labeled beer. All of the provisions of this chapter rela- 10 tive to licenses to sell beer at retail for consumption on the premises 11 shall apply so far as applicable to such licensee. Notwithstanding any 12 other provision of law, the licensed brewer may apply to the liquor 13 authority for a license to sell beer, wine or liquor at retail for 14 consumption on the premises at such establishment. All of the provisions 15 of this chapter relative to licenses to sell beer, wine or liquor at 16 retail for consumption on the premises shall apply so far as applicable 17 to such application. 18 § 2. Paragraph (g) of subdivision 2 of section 51-a of the alcoholic 19 beverage control law, as amended by chapter 522 of the laws of 2018, is 20 amended to read as follows: 21 (g) operate a restaurant, a hotel, an establishment designated and 22 commonly known and operated as a bed and breakfast, a catering estab- 23 lishment, or other food and drinking establishment in or adjacent to the 24 licensed premises and sell at such place, at retail for consumption on EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01868-01-5 S. 2051 2 1 the premises, beer, cider, and braggot manufactured by the licensee and 2 any New York state labeled beer, New York state labeled braggot or New 3 York state labeled cider. All of the provisions of this chapter relative 4 to licenses to sell beer, cider, and braggot at retail for consumption 5 on and off the premises shall apply so far as applicable to such licen- 6 see. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the licensed farm 7 brewery may apply to the authority for a license under this chapter to 8 sell other alcoholic beverages at retail for consumption on the premises 9 at such establishment; 10 § 3. Subparagraph (ii) of paragraph (f) of subdivision 2 of section 11 58-c of the alcoholic beverage control law, as amended by chapter 431 of 12 the laws of 2014, is amended to read as follows: 13 (ii) operate a restaurant, a hotel, an establishment designated and 14 commonly known and operated as a bed and breakfast, a catering estab- 15 lishment, or other food and drinking establishment in or adjacent to the 16 licensed premises and sell at such place, at retail for consumption on 17 the premises, cider manufactured by the licensee and any New York state 18 labeled cider. All of the provisions of this chapter relative to licen- 19 sees to selling cider at retail shall apply. Notwithstanding any other 20 provision of law, the licensed farm cidery may apply to the authority 21 for a license under this chapter to sell other alcoholic beverages at 22 retail for consumption on the premises at such establishment; 23 § 4. Subparagraph (ii) of paragraph (e) of subdivision 2-c of section 24 61 of the alcoholic beverage control law, as amended by chapter 431 of 25 the laws of 2014, is amended to read as follows: 26 (ii) operate a restaurant, a hotel, an establishment designated and 27 commonly known and operated as a bed and breakfast, a catering estab- 28 lishment, or other food and drinking establishment in or adjacent to the 29 licensed premises and sell at such place, at retail for consumption on 30 the premises, liquor manufactured by the licensee and any New York state 31 labeled liquor. All of the provisions of this chapter relative to 32 licenses to sell liquor at retail for consumption on the premises shall 33 apply so far as applicable to such licensee. Notwithstanding any other 34 provision of law, the licensee may apply to the authority for a license 35 under this chapter to sell other alcoholic beverages at retail for 36 consumption on the premises at such establishment. 37 § 5. Subdivision 5-a of section 64 of the alcoholic beverage control 38 law, as added by chapter 480 of the laws of 2003, is amended to read as 39 follows: 40 5-a. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision five of this 41 section, a liquor license may be issued under this section to an estab- 42 lishment designated and commonly known and operated as a "bed and break- 43 fast" regardless of whether or not a restaurant is operated in such 44 establishment[, provided that such license shall only permit the sale of 45 alcoholic beverages to overnight guests of such establishment]. 46 § 6. Subdivision 4-a of section 76 of the alcoholic beverage control 47 law, as amended by chapter 522 of the laws of 2018, is amended to read 48 as follows: 49 4-a. A licensed winery may operate a restaurant, a hotel, an estab- 50 lishment designated and commonly known and operated as a bed and break- 51 fast, a catering establishment, or other food and drinking establishment 52 in or adjacent to the licensed premises and sell at such place, at 53 retail for consumption on the premises, wine, mead and wine products 54 manufactured by the licensee and any New York state labeled wine, mead 55 or New York state labeled wine product. All of the provisions of this 56 chapter relative to licenses to sell wine at retail for consumption on S. 2051 3 1 the premises shall apply so far as applicable to such licensee. 2 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the licensed winery may 3 apply to the authority for a license under article four of this chapter 4 to sell other alcoholic beverages at retail for consumption on the prem- 5 ises at such establishment. 6 § 7. Paragraph (f) of subdivision 2 of section 76-a of the alcoholic 7 beverage control law, as amended by chapter 522 of the laws of 2018, is 8 amended to read as follows: 9 (f) operate a restaurant, a hotel, an establishment designated and 10 commonly known and operated as a bed and breakfast, a catering estab- 11 lishment, or other food and drinking establishment in or adjacent to the 12 licensed premises and sell at such place, at retail for consumption on 13 the premises, wine, cider, and mead manufactured by the licensee and any 14 New York state labeled wine, New York state labeled cider, New York 15 state labeled mead or New York state labeled wine product. All of the 16 provisions of this chapter relative to licenses to sell wine at retail 17 for consumption on the premises shall apply so far as applicable to such 18 licensee. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the licensed farm 19 winery may apply to the authority for a license under this chapter to 20 sell other alcoholic beverages at retail for consumption on the premises 21 at such establishment. 22 § 8. This act shall take effect immediately.